Tennessee, session 114, HB2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70, Chapter 9, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
The director shall post the list of areas within the state that allow the use of off-
highway motor vehicles developed pursuant to § 70-9-104(6) on the commission's
website. The list must indicate the acreage of each area and an estimated length of the
trails in the area.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2091
011657
- 1 -